North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Part 1. Definitions.

§ 163-165.
Definitions.

In addition to the definitions stated below, the definitions set forth in Article 15A of this Chapter also apply to this Part. As used in this Part:

“Ballot” means an instrument on which a voter indicates that voter’s choice for a ballot item so that it may be recorded as a vote for or against a certain candidate or referendum proposal, and is evidenced by an individual paper document that bears marks
made by the voter by hand or through electronic means, whether preprinted or printed in the voting enclosure.

“Ballot item” means a single item on a ballot in which the voters are to choose between or among the candidates or proposals listed.

“Ballot style” means the version of a ballot within a jurisdiction that an individual voter is eligible to vote. For example, in a county that uses essentially the same official ballot, a group office such as county commissioner may be divided into districts
so that different voters in the same county vote for commissioner in different districts. The different versions of the county’s official ballot containing only those district ballot items one individual voter may vote are the
county’s different ballot styles.

“Election” means the event in which voters cast votes in ballot items concerning proposals or candidates for office in this State or the United States. The term includes primaries, general elections, referenda, and special elections.

“Official ballot” means a ballot that has been certified by the State Board of Elections and produced by or with the approval of the county board of elections. The term does not include a sample ballot or a specimen ballot.

“Provisional official ballot” means an official ballot that is voted and then placed in an envelope that contains an affidavit signed by the voter certifying identity and eligibility to vote. Except for its envelope, a provisional official ballot shall
not be marked to make it identifiable to the voter.

“Referendum” means the event in which voters cast votes for or against ballot questions other than the election of candidates to office.

“Voting booth” means the private space in which a voter is to mark an official ballot.

“Voting enclosure” means the room within the voting place that is used for voting.

“Voting place” means the building or area of the building that contains the voting enclosure.

“Voting system” means a system of casting and tabulating ballots. The term includes systems of paper ballots counted by hand as well as systems utilizing mechanical and electronic voting equipment.

History.
2001-460, s. 3; 2001-466, s. 3(a), (b); 2002-159, s. 21(h); 2006-262, s. 4; 2013-381, ss. 30.1, 30.2; 2015-103, ss. 4(a), 5(a), 6(b); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-13, s. 3.11(b); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).